Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3429
Power of attorney; prohibited acts.

(1) No person shall be required to execute or to refrain from executing a power of attorney for health care as a criterion for insurance or as a condition for receiving health care.

(2) No person authorized to engage in the business of insurance in this state, medical care corporation, health care corporation, health maintenance organization, other health care plan, or legal entity that is self-insured and provides benefits to its employees or members shall do any of the following because of the execution or implementation of a power of attorney for health care or because of the failure or refusal to execute or implement a power of attorney for health care: (a) Refuse to provide or continue coverage to any person; (b) limit or increase the amount of coverage available to any person; (c) charge a person a different rate; (d) consider the terms of an existing policy of life or health insurance to have been breached or modified; or (e) invoke a suicide or intentional death exemption or exclusion in a policy covering the person.

(3) Nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall be intended to impair or supersede any federal statute.

(4) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of section 30-3408 and subsection (4) of section 30-3420, nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall impair or supersede any durable power of attorney in effect prior to January 1, 1993.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 29.